Hawaii, session 2026, HB2534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that education in robotics provides hands-on science, technology, engineering, and mathematics learning that increases critical thinking and creative problem-solving skills among students.  Since the first robotics program was established at Waialua High School in 1999, the State has embraced robotics technology as both an educational and a competitive platform.  Between 2008 and 2012, the legislature supported robotics programs through measures such as Act 111, Session Laws of Hawaii 2007, and other measures investing in Hawaii's emerging science and technology fields by funding scholarships for the State's first "For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and Technology" (FIRST) regional competition. Through FIRST and VEX Robotics, two major robotics programs for students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelve, Hawaii's robotics teams engage more than two thousand five hundred students from numerous schools across the State.  Today, these robotics teams achieve national and international success and contribute to the community by leading local science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education initiatives. The legislature further finds that since 2009, the State has lost numerous high school robotics teams due to insufficient resources and a lack of mentors.  Unlike most extracurricular activities, robotics is conducted year-round, with each team having several mentors.  The cost of hosting a competition can exceed hundreds or even thousands of dollars. Likewise, recent federal funding cuts have impacted several Hawaii robotics teams.  These funding cuts force robotics teams to rely on competitive grants, which are not guaranteed.  The lack of consistent funding has threatened robotics programs at Maui high school, James Campbell high school, and several others. Furthermore, the legislature recognizes that participation in robotics encourages students to join the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics workforce.  A majority of high school robotics alumni are employed in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics fields.  However, the legislature finds that the State lacks a long-term science, technology, engineering, and mathematics workforce.  According to data from the department of business, economic development, and tourism, a higher percentage of Hawaii-born students in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics occupations live in the continental United States than in the State.  By supporting robotics programs, the State can stimulate economic growth and ensure Hawaii's youth have access to stable career paths. In addition, the legislature finds that, to sustain robotics programs and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education, states such as Texas and Connecticut recognize robotics as a sanctioned sport.  According to the Oxford dictionary, a sport is "an activity involving physical exertion and skill in which an individual or team competes against another or others for entertainment."  Robotics requires intense teamwork, physical endurance, and strategic thinking, and attracts crowds to competitions. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to ensure high‑quality science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education and to strengthen the State's technology workforce by appropriating moneys to establish robotics as an interscholastic sport. SECTION 2.  In establishing robotics as an interscholastic sport, the department of education shall minimize any documentation required for teams to participate. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish robotics as an interscholastic sport. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________